Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-339
Branch offices; establish; application; fee.

(1) Licensees under the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act may apply to establish branch offices, whether in this state, or in another state or United States territory, at which the licensable business activities of the licensee may be conducted.

(2) Such application shall be on a form prescribed and furnished by the director and shall be accompanied by a branch application fee, along with any processing fee allowed for by section 45-373. Such branch application fees shall be:

(a) Two hundred fifty dollars for an installment loan branch license; and

(b) One hundred dollars for an installment sales branch license.

Laws 1965, c. 268, § 6, p. 761;

Laws 2025, LB474, § 60.